Tennessee, session 114, HB0207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-113(c)(1), is amended by
deleting "aggregated over a ninety-day period" and substituting "aggregated over a one-
hundred-eighty-day period".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-113(c), is amended by adding
the following as new subdivisions:
(3) Knowingly removes, destroys, deactivates, or evades any component of an
anti-shoplifting or inventory control device to prevent the activation of that device or to
facilitate the commission of an offense under this subsection (c);
(4) Knowingly activates or interferes with a fire alarm system during the
commission of an offense under this subsection (c) or to facilitate the commission of an
offense under this subsection (c);
(5) Knowingly uses an online marketplace or a social media platform to
coordinate a meeting with one (1) or more individuals to sell, barter, or trade stolen
merchandise for monetary or other gain;
(6) Knowingly returns stolen merchandise or counterfeit merchandise to a retail
merchant;
(7) Receives, purchases, or possesses retail merchandise for the purpose of
sale or resale knowing or believing the merchandise to be stolen from a merchant;
HB0207
001172
- 1 -

(8) Knowingly uses any artifice, instrument, container, device, or other article to
facilitate the commission of an offense under this subsection (c);
(9) Knowingly uses a device or apparatus, including, but not limited to, a device
or apparatus that can be affixed to point-of-sale terminals, automated teller machines,
fuel pumps, and other payment processing devices, unlawfully to capture, record, or
transmit the electronic information contained on the magnetic strip or embedded chip of
a credit card, debit card, or other payment device with the intent to defraud another; or
(10) Knowingly possesses, controls, or has custody of ten (10) or more
fraudulently obtained access devices, including gift cards, with the intent to defraud
another. As used in this subdivision (c)(10), "access devices" means any card, plate,
code, account number, electronic serial number, mobile identification number, personal
identification number, or other means of account access that can be used, alone or in
conjunction with another access device, to obtain money, goods, services, or other thing
of value, whether the device is physical or digital.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-113(d), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) A violation of subsection (c) is punished one (1) classification higher than
provided in § 39-14-105 if the defendant engages in the destruction of property or uses a
weapon during the commission of the offense.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001172